Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Secretary of State

48-247-201. Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the secretary of state by chapters 201-248 of this title, including, without limitation, the power to promulgate necessary and appropriate rules and regulations consistent with chapters 201-248 of this title, and the power to destroy any records in the secretary of state's office concerning a domestic or foreign LLC ten (10) years after such LLC has dissolved, withdrawn from the state, or has had its certificate of authority revoked.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-247-202. Deputies of secretary of state.

An act of a duly authorized deputy of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf under chapters 201-248 of this title is the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state; provided, that the deputy signs the name of the secretary of state by such deputy as deputy.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.